Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission operations ............. $ 25,794,527
(2) Public university operations
and student support
for distribution to
public universities..................... $836,898,583
(3) Community College Support
Fund for distribution to
community colleges and
community college service
districts..................................... $640,926,933
(4) Skills centers and education
support for distribution to
community colleges and
school districts .......................... $ 3,854,524
(5) Oregon Opportunity Grants ...... $109,510,413
(6) Oregon Promise grants ............. $ 40,000,000
(7) Other student assistance .......... $ 5,265,226
(8) Oregon Health and Science
University education and
other programs ......................... $ 67,757,797
(9) Public university statewide
programs................................... $ 44,238,996
(10) Agricultural Experiment
Station and the branch
extension stations of
Oregon State University ........... $ 73,788,861
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 1
(11) Oregon State University
Extension Service ..................... $ 53,217,403
(12) Forest Research Laboratory
at Oregon State University ....... $ 11,424,041
(13) Oregon Health and Science
University Child Development
and Rehabilitation Center......... $ 8,639,193
(14) Oregon Health and Science
University hospitals and
clinics for operation of
Oregon Poison Center ............... $ 2,764,543
(15) Workforce and other special
payments................................... $ 8,454,071
(16) Debt service and related costs:
(a) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ................... $ 34,718,310
(b) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-F(1) of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 34,660
(c) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 98,157,680
(d) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon Health
and Science University ............. $ 23,864,460
(e) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-Q of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 91,677,010
(f) Repayment of energy loans made
to Oregon public universities
by the State Department of
Energy....................................... $ 13,165,216
(g) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon public universities ........ $ 951,606
(h) Debt-related costs on bonds
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 2
sold for the benefit of
Oregon community colleges ...... $ 117,466
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$34,519,205 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon public universities.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$11,520,140 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon community colleges.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$40,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Education  Stability Fund to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission for Oregon Opportunity Grants.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$45,305,847 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission to the Outdoor
School Education Fund.
SECTION 5a.  Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,240,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from lottery moneys
allocated to the Sports Lottery Account.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds and funds described in sections 8 to 12 of this 2019
Act, collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 11,200,399
(2) Other programs ........................  $ 34,421,098
(3) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-L of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon Health
and Science University ............. $ 30,871,500
(4) Debt service on outstanding
lottery bonds and general
obligation bonds sold pursuant
to Articles XI-G and XI-Q of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 1
(5) Debt service on outstanding
lottery bonds and general
obligation bonds sold pursuant
to Article XI-G of the Oregon
Constitution for the benefit
of Oregon community colleges .. $ 1
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 3
(6) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon Health
and Science University ............. $ 1
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 10  of this 2019
Act, collected or received by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 23,083,445
(2) Other programs ........................  $ 104,411,185
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $45,810
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from  the moneys received
from the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax  Fund and the Eastern Oregon Timber
Severance Tax Fund for the Community College Support Fund.
SECTION 9.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Higher Educa-
tion Coordinating Commission for debt service on general  obligation bonds and certificates
of participation issued for the benefit of public universities and  Oregon Health and Science
University and paid with resources received from the public universities and Oregon Health
and Science University are not limited.
SECTION 10. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for payments  to individuals, organizations or units of gov-
ernment from federal National Emergency Grants funds are not limited.
SECTION 11. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for debt service on Build  America Bonds sold for the benefit
of public universities and community colleges are not limited.
SECTION 12. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission of moneys from the Tuition Protection Fund are not limited.
SECTION 13. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 4
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 5